Washington statutes.
RCW 2.68.040

Judicial information system account—Increase in fines, penalties, assessments—Exception.

(1) To support the judicial information system account provided for in RCW 2.68.020, the supreme court may provide by rule for an increase in fines, penalties, and assessments, and the increased amount shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the account:

(a) Pursuant to the authority of RCW 46.63.110(3), the sum of ten dollars to any penalty collected by a court pursuant to supreme court infraction rules for courts of limited jurisdiction;

(b) Pursuant to RCW 3.62.060, a mandatory appearance cost in the initial sum of ten dollars to be assessed on all defendants; and

(c) Pursuant to RCW 46.63.110(6), a ten-dollar assessment for each account for which a person requests a time payment schedule.

(2) Notwithstanding a provision of law or rule to the contrary, the assessments provided for in this section may not be waived or suspended and shall be immediately due and payable upon forfeiture, conviction, deferral of prosecution, or request for time payment, as each shall occur.

(3) The supreme court is requested to adjust these assessments for inflation.

(4) This section does not apply to the additional monetary penalty under RCW 46.20.500.

(5) This section does not apply to the additional monetary fine under RCW 46.61.110, 46.61.145, 46.61.180, 46.61.185, 46.61.190, and 46.61.205.

(6) This section does not apply to the additional monetary penalties under RCW 46.61.165.

(7) In addition to any amount prescribed by rule under subsection (1)(a) of this section as an assessment on traffic infractions dedicated for the judicial information system, there shall be assessed $2 on each traffic infraction. The additional $2 shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the driver licensing technology support account, created under RCW 46.68.067, to be used to support information technology systems used by the department of licensing to communicate with the judicial information system, manage driving records, and implement court orders.

[ 2021 c 240 s 14. Prior: 2019 c 467 s 6; 2019 c 403 s 12; 2019 c 65 s 6; 1994 c 8 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 240: See note following RCW 46.63.060.

Finding—Intent—2019 c 467: See note following RCW 46.20.289.

Finding—Intent—Effective date—2019 c 403: See notes following RCW 46.04.071.

Finding—Effective date—2019 c 65: See notes following RCW 46.81A.020.